Hawaii statutes.
§39A‑201 Special purpose revenue
bonds not a general obligation of the State. No holder or holders of any
special purpose revenue bonds issued under this part shall ever have the right
to compel any exercise of taxing power of the State to pay such bonds or the
interest thereon and no moneys other than the revenues pledged to such bonds
shall be applied to the payment thereof. Each special purpose revenue bond
issued under this part shall recite in substance that such bond, including
interest thereon, is not a general obligation of the State and is payable
solely from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof, and that such bond is
not secured directly or indirectly by the full faith and credit or the general
credit of the State or by any revenues or taxes of the State other than the
revenues specifically pledged thereto. [L 1981, c 151, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next